Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2126.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 913(b)(3) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 913. Possession of firearm or other dangerous weapon in court facility.* * *(b) Grading.--* * *(3) An offense under subsection (a)(1) is a summary 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 offense if the person was carrying a firearm under section 6106(b) (relating to firearms not to be carried without a license) or 6109 (relating to [licenses] license to carry) and failed to check the firearm under subsection (e) prior to entering the court facility.* * *Section 2. Section 6102 of Title 18 is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this subchapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this subchapter, the following words and phrases, when used in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Firearm eligibility license." A license issued by the commissioner that authorizes a person to purchase a firearm.* * *"Qualified firearm instructor." A certified firearms instructor who is recognized by the Pennsylvania State Police and has one of the following:(1) A valid qualified firearm instructor license issued by the commissioner.(2) A certificate issued by a nationally recognized firearms organization.* * *Section 3. Section 6105(h) of Title 18 is amended and subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6105. Persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell 20260HB2126PN2748 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or transfer firearms.* * *(c) Other persons.--In addition to any person who has been convicted of any offense listed under subsection (b), the following persons shall be subject to the prohibition of subsection (a):* * *(11) A person who does not possess a valid firearm eligibility license required under section 6109.1 (relating to firearm eligibility license).* * *(h) License prohibition.--Any person who is prohibited from possessing, using, controlling, selling, purchasing, transferring or manufacturing any firearm under this section shall not be eligible for or permitted to obtain a license to carry a firearm under section 6109 (relating to [licenses] license to carry).* * *Section 4. Sections 6106(a) and (b)(12) and 6107(a)(2) of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6106. Firearms not to be carried without a license.(a) Offense defined.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any person who carries a firearm in any vehicle or any person who carries a firearm concealed on or about his person, except in his place of abode or fixed place of business, without a valid and lawfully issued license [under this chapter] to carry under section 6109 (relating to license to carry) commits a felony of the third degree.(2) A person who is otherwise eligible to possess a 20260HB2126PN2748 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 valid license [under this chapter] to carry under section 6109 but carries a firearm in any vehicle or any person who carries a firearm concealed on or about his person, except in his place of abode or fixed place of business, without a valid and lawfully issued license to carry and has not committed any other criminal violation commits a misdemeanor of the first degree.(b) Exceptions.--The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to:* * *(12) A person who has a lawfully issued license to carry a firearm pursuant to section 6109 [(relating to licenses)] and that said license expired within six months prior to the date of arrest and that the individual is otherwise eligible for renewal of the license.* * *§ 6107. Prohibited conduct during emergency.(a) General rule.--No person shall carry a firearm upon the public streets or upon any public property during an emergency proclaimed by a State or municipal governmental executive unless that person is:* * *(2) Licensed to carry firearms under section 6109 (relating to [licenses] license to carry) or is exempt from licensing under section 6106(b) (relating to firearms not to be carried without a license).* * *Section 5. Section 6109 heading, (c), (d)(4) and (5) of Title 18 are amended, subsection (d) is amended by adding a paragraph and subsection (e)(1) and (3) are amended by adding 20260HB2126PN2748 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subparagraphs to read:§ 6109. [Licenses] License to carry.* * *(c) Form of application and content.--The application for a license to carry a firearm shall be uniform throughout this Commonwealth and shall be on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. The form may contain provisions, not exceeding one page, to assure compliance with this section. Issuing authorities shall use only the application form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. One of the following reasons for obtaining a firearm license shall be set forth in the application: self-defense, employment, hunting and fishing, target shooting, gun collecting or another proper reason. The application form shall be dated and signed by the applicant and shall contain the following statement:I am the holder of a valid firearm eligibility license. I have never been convicted of a crime that prohibits me from possessing or acquiring a firearm under Federal or State law. I am of sound mind and have never been committed to a mental institution. I hereby certify that the statements contained herein are true and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief. I understand that, if I knowingly make any false statements herein, I am subject to penalties prescribed by law. I authorize the sheriff, or his designee, or, in the case of first class cities, the chief or head of the police department, or his designee, to inspect only those records or documents relevant to information required for this application. If I am issued a license and knowingly become ineligible to legally possess or acquire firearms, I will promptly 20260HB2126PN2748 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notify the sheriff of the county in which I reside or, if I reside in a city of the first class, the chief of police of that city.(d) Sheriff to conduct investigation.--The sheriff to whom the application is made shall:* * *(4) investigate whether the applicant would be precluded from receiving a license under subsection (e)(1) or section 6105(h) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms); [and](5) conduct a criminal background, juvenile delinquency and mental health check following the procedures set forth in section 6111 (relating to sale or transfer of firearms), receive a unique approval number for that inquiry and record the date and number on the application[.]; and(6) confirm with the Pennsylvania State Police that the applicant holds a valid firearm eligibility license under section 6109.1 (relating to firearm eligibility license).(e) Issuance of license.--(1) A license to carry a firearm shall be for the purpose of carrying a firearm concealed on or about one's person or in a vehicle and shall be issued if, after an investigation not to exceed 45 days, it appears that the applicant is an individual concerning whom no good cause exists to deny the license. A license shall not be issued to any of the following:* * *(xv) An individual who does not possess a valid firearm eligibility license under section 6109.1.(3) The license to carry a firearm shall be designed to 20260HB2126PN2748 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be uniform throughout this Commonwealth and shall be in a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. The license shall bear the following:* * *(vii) The number of the licensee's firearm eligibility license.* * *Section 6. Title 18 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 6109.1. Firearm eligibility license.(a) Requirement.--Except as provided in subsection (b), an individual shall be required to possess a valid firearm eligibility license in order to purchase a firearm within this Commonwealth.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to any of the following:(1) A licensed firearms manufacturer.(2) A dealer licensed under section 6113 (relating to licensing of dealers).(3) A law enforcement officer or person who is retired in good standing from service with a law enforcement agency of the United States, this Commonwealth or a local law enforcement agency of this Commonwealth.(4) A member or retired member of the armed forces of the United States or the Pennsylvania National Guard.(5) A person purchasing, owning, possessing or receiving an antique firearm as defined in section 6118 (relating to antique firearms) or reproductions or replicas of firearms if the antique firearm, reproduction or replica is not suitable for use.§ 6109.2. Application for firearm eligibility license.20260HB2126PN2748 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Place of application.--An individual may apply to an issuing authority, as defined under section 6109.4(f) (relating to training course and investigations), for a firearm eligibility license. If the applicant is a resident of this Commonwealth, the applicant must apply with the sheriff of the county in which the applicant resides. If the applicant lives in a city of the first class, the applicant must apply with the chief of police of the city.(b) Form of application and content.--The application for a firearm eligibility license shall be uniform across this Commonwealth and shall be on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. Each application shall be signed and dated by the applicant. The form may contain provisions, not exceeding one page, to ensure compliance with this section. Issuing authorities shall use only the application form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. The application shall contain the following statement:I have never been convicted of a crime that prohibits me from possessing or acquiring a firearm under Federal or State law. I am of sound mind and have never been committed to a mental institution. I hereby certify that the statements contained herein are true and correct to the best of my knowledge and belief. I understand that, if I knowingly make any false statement herein, I am subject to penalties prescribed by law. I authorize the sheriff or the sheriff's designee, or the chief of the police department or the chief's designee, to inspect only those records or documents relevant to the information required for this application. If I am issued a license and knowingly become ineligible to legally 20260HB2126PN2748 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 possess or acquire firearms, I will promptly notify the sheriff of the county in which I reside or, if I reside in a city of the first class, the chief of police of that city.§ 6109.3. Fee and qualification.(a) Firearm eligibility license fee.--(1) The fees for a firearm eligibility license are as follows:(i) Fifty dollars for the original license.(ii) Thirty dollars for a license renewal that includes the following:(A) A renewal processing fee of $1.50.(B) An administrative fee of $5 under section 14(2) of the act of July 6, 1984 (P.L.614, No.127), known as the Sheriff Fee Act.(C) An administrative fee of $2 for the costs of completing the background investigation under section 6109.4(c) (relating to training course and investigations). The fee shall be deposited into the Firearm Instant Records Check Fund under section 6111.2 (relating to firearm sales surcharge).(2) All license fees remaining after the fees under paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the General Fund.(3) No fee other than under this section or the Sheriff Fee Act may be assessed by the issuing authority, as defined under section 6109.4(f), for the cost of a background check performed in the process of issuing a firearm eligibility license.(b) Qualifications for license.--An issuing authority, as defined under section 6109.4(f), shall issue a firearm 20260HB2126PN2748 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 eligibility license to an applicant who meets the following criteria:(1) Is at least 18 years of age.(2) Is a resident of this Commonwealth.(3) Within three years prior to the submission of the application, demonstrates satisfactory completion of a certified firearms training course approved by the commissioner that includes all of the following:(i) A minimum of 16 hours of instruction by a qualified firearm instructor.(ii) Classroom instruction on all the following:(A) Commonwealth firearm law.(B) Home firearm safety.(C) Firearm mechanisms and operations.(iii) A firearms orientation component that demonstrates the person's safe operation, handling and use of a firearm.(4) Is not prohibited by Federal or State law from purchasing or possessing a firearm. For purposes of determining this, the following shall apply:(i) The applicant shall provide a full set of fingerprints to the Pennsylvania State Police.(ii) The Pennsylvania State Police shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to verify the identity of the applicant and obtain a current record of criminal arrests and convictions.§ 6109.4. Training course and investigations.(a) Firearms training course.--The commissioner shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To promulgate guidelines setting forth the 20260HB2126PN2748 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements to become a qualified firearm instructor in this Commonwealth.(2) To designate any program as a certified firearm training course if the program meets the minimum requirements established by the commissioner.(b) Waiver of training course.--An applicant for a firearm eligibility license shall not be required to complete a firearm safety training course under subsection (a) if the applicant is any of the following:(1) A qualified firearm instructor.(2) A member or honorably discharged member of the armed forces of the United States or the National Guard.(3) A police officer, as defined in 53 Pa.C.S. § 2162 (relating to definitions) who is certified under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training). The term includes a school police officer appointed under section 1302-C of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(4) An active or retired Federal or State law enforcement officer.(5) Certified under 61 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to county probation officers' firearm education and training).(6) A Commonwealth or county corrections officer or probation or parole agent.(7) A county sheriff, deputy sheriff or constable.(8) The lawful owner of a firearm prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(c) Conduct of investigation.--The issuing authority to whom the application is made shall:(1) Investigate the applicant's record of criminal 20260HB2126PN2748 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conviction.(2) Review the applicant's completed Federal criminal history check.(3) Investigate whether the applicant would be precluded or is prohibited from possessing, using, controlling, selling, purchasing, transferring or manufacturing a firearm under section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms).(4) Conduct a criminal background, juvenile delinquency and mental health check following the procedures set forth in section 6111 (relating to sale or transfer of firearms), receive a unique approval number for that inquiry and record the date and number on the application.(d) Notice to issuing authority.--A court, mental health review officer or county administrator for mental health and intellectual disability services shall notify the issuing authority of the county or city in which an individual holds a firearm eligibility license on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police within seven days of the individual's conviction or adjudication or upon determination of any of the following:(1) A crime specified in section 6105(a) or (b).(2) A crime punishable by imprisonment exceeding one year.(3) Conduct that meets the criteria of section 6105(c)(1), (2), (3), (5), (6) or (9).(4) Incompetency.(5) Involuntary commitment to a mental institution for inpatient care and treatment under the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act.20260HB2126PN2748 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Involuntary treatment for an individual meeting the criteria of section 6105(c)(4).(e) Immunity.--An issuing authority that complies in good faith with this section shall be immune from liability resulting or arising from the action of misconduct with a firearm committed by an individual who was issued a firearm eligibility license.(f) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "issuing authority" shall mean a county sheriff or chief of police of a city of the first class.§ 6109.5. Issuance and terms.(a) Issuance of license.--(1) An applicant that meets the requirements of this section shall be issued a firearm eligibility license. A license may not be issued to an individual who is prohibited from possessing, using, controlling, selling, purchasing, transferring or manufacturing a firearm under section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms) or under any other Federal or State law.(2) The firearm eligibility license shall be uniform throughout this Commonwealth and shall be in a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police. The license shall bear the following:(i) The name, address, date of birth, race, sex, citizenship, height, weight, color of hair, color of eyes and signature of the licensee.(ii) The signature of the issuing authority.(iii) A license number of which the first two numbers shall be a county location code. The remaining 20260HB2126PN2748 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 numbers shall be issued in numerical sequence.(iv) The period of validation.(3) The firearm eligibility license shall include a photograph of the licensee. The photograph shall be in a form compatible with the Commonwealth Photo Imaging Network.(4) The original firearm eligibility license shall be issued to the applicant. The first copy of the license shall be forwarded to the Pennsylvania State Police within seven days of the date of issuance. The second copy shall be retained by the issuing authority for a period of seven years. Except under a court order, both copies and the application shall, at the end of the seven-year period, be destroyed unless the license has been renewed.(b) Grant or denial of license.--Upon receipt of an application for a firearm eligibility license, the issuing authority shall issue or refuse to issue within 30 days a license on the basis of the investigation under section 6109.4(c) (relating to training course and investigations) and the accuracy of the information contained in the application. If the issuing authority refuses to issue a license, the issuing authority shall notify the applicant in writing of the refusal and the specific reason. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant at the address included in the application.(c) Term of license.--(1) A firearm eligibility license issued under subsection (a) shall be valid throughout this Commonwealth for a period of five years unless extended under paragraph (3) or revoked.(2) At least 60 days prior to the expiration of each 20260HB2126PN2748 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license, the issuing authority shall send to the licensee an application for renewal of the license. Failure to receive a renewal application shall not relieve a licensee from the responsibility to renew the license.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or any other provisions of law to the contrary, a firearm eligibility license that is held by a member of the United States Armed Forces or the Pennsylvania National Guard on Federal active duty and deployed overseas that is scheduled to expire during the period of deployment shall be extended until 90 days after the end of the deployment.(4) Possession of a firearm eligibility license, together with a copy of the person's military orders showing the dates of the overseas deployment, including the date that the overseas deployment ends, shall constitute a defense to any charge filed under this section during the extension period.(d) Revocation.--(1) A firearm eligibility license may be revoked by the issuing authority for any reason under section 6105(b) or (c) if the violation occurs during the term of the license. The revocation shall be in accordance with the following:(i) Notice of revocation shall:(A) Be in writing and shall state the specific reason for revocation.(B) Be sent by certified mail to the individual.(C) Be provided to the Pennsylvania State Police by electronic means, including email or facsimile transmission.(ii) An individual who has had a license revoked may 20260HB2126PN2748 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appeal to the court of common pleas for the judicial district in which the individual resides.(2) An individual who violates this subsection commits a summary offense.(e) Immunity.--An issuing authority that complies in good faith with this section shall be immune from liability resulting or arising from the action of misconduct with a firearm committed by an individual who was issued a firearm eligibility license.(f) Reciprocity.--The Attorney General shall:(1) Have the power and duty to enter into reciprocity agreements with other states providing for the mutual recognition of a firearm eligibility license issued by the Commonwealth and a firearm eligibility license or permit issued by another state.(2) Have the power to negotiate reciprocity agreements and grant recognition to a firearm eligibility license or permit issued by another state.(3) Report to the General Assembly within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph and annually thereafter on the agreements that have been made under this section.(g) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "issuing authority" means a county sheriff or chief of police of a city of the first class.Section 7. Section 6111(b)(1.1)(iii), (f)(3) and (g)(4)(iii) of Title 18 are amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(b) Duty of seller.--No licensed importer, licensed 20260HB2126PN2748 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufacturer or licensed dealer shall sell or deliver any firearm to another person, other than a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer or licensed collector, until the conditions of subsection (a) have been satisfied and until he has:* * *(1.1) On the date of publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin of a notice by the Pennsylvania State Police that the instantaneous records check has been implemented, all of the following shall apply:* * *(iii) For purposes of conducting the criminal history, juvenile delinquency and mental health records background check which shall be completed within ten days of receipt of the information from the dealer, the application/record of sale shall include the name, address, birthdate, gender, race, physical description [and], Social Security number of the purchaser or transferee, the purchaser or transferee's firearm eligibility license number and the date of application.* * *(2.1) Inspected the firearm eligibility license of the potential purchaser or transferee.* * *(f) Application of section.--* * *(3) The provisions contained in subsection (a) shall not apply to any law enforcement officer whose current identification as a law enforcement officer shall be construed as a valid license to carry a firearm or any person 20260HB2126PN2748 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 who possesses a valid license to carry a firearm under section 6109 (relating to [licenses] license to carry).* * *(g) Penalties.--* * *(4) Any person, purchaser or transferee commits a felony of the third degree if, in connection with the purchase, delivery or transfer of a firearm under this chapter, he knowingly and intentionally:* * *(iii) willfully furnishes or exhibits any false identification, including a false firearm eligibility license, intended or likely to deceive the seller, licensed dealer or licensed manufacturer.* * *Section 8. Section 6111.1(b)(2) and (3) and (e)(1) of Title 18 are amended and subsections (b) and (i) are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 6111.1. Pennsylvania State Police.* * *(b) Duty of Pennsylvania State Police.--* * *(1.1) Upon receipt of an application for a firearm eligibility license under section 6109.1 (relating to firearm eligibility license), the Pennsylvania State Police shall immediately:(i) Review the Pennsylvania State Police criminal history and fingerprint records to determine whether the applicant is prohibited from receipt or possession of a firearm under Federal or State law.20260HB2126PN2748 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Review the juvenile delinquency and mental health records of the Pennsylvania State Police to determine whether the applicant is prohibited from receipt or possession of a firearm under Federal or State law.(iii) Inform the issuing authority of whether:(A) The issuance of a firearm eligibility license is prohibited.(B) The individual is cleared for a firearm eligibility license. If the Pennsylvania State Police determines that the individual is eligible, the Pennsylvania State Police shall provide the issuing authority with the individual's firearm eligibility license.(2) In the event of electronic failure, scheduled computer downtime or similar event beyond the control of the Pennsylvania State Police, the Pennsylvania State Police shall immediately notify the requesting licensee under paragraph (1) or the applicant under paragraph (1.1) of the reason for and estimated length of the delay. If the failure or event lasts for a period exceeding 48 hours, the dealer shall not be subject to any penalty for completing a transaction absent the completion of an instantaneous records check for the remainder of the failure or similar event, but the dealer shall obtain a completed application/record of sale following the provisions of section 6111(b)(1) and (1.1) (relating to sale or transfer of firearms) as if an instantaneous records check has not been established for any sale or transfer of a firearm for the purpose of a subsequent background check.20260HB2126PN2748 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The Pennsylvania State Police shall fully comply, execute and enforce the directives of this section as follows:(i) The instantaneous background check for firearms as defined in section 6102 (relating to definitions) shall begin on July 1, 1998.(ii) The instantaneous background check for firearms that exceed the barrel lengths set forth in section 6102 shall begin on the later of:(A) the date of publication of the notice under section 6111(a)(2); or(B) December 31, 1998.(iii) The instantaneous background check for a firearm eligibility license shall take effect on the effective date of this subparagraph.* * *(e) Challenge to records.--(1) Any person who is denied a firearm eligibility license or is denied the right to receive, sell, transfer, possess, carry, manufacture or purchase a firearm as a result of the procedures established by this section may challenge the accuracy of that person's criminal history, juvenile delinquency history or mental health record pursuant to a denial by the instantaneous records check by submitting a challenge to the Pennsylvania State Police within 30 days from the date of the denial.* * *(i) Reports.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall annually compile and report to the General Assembly, on or before December 31, the following information for the previous year:20260HB2126PN2748 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(1.1) number of firearm eligibility license applications submitted, number of applications denied, number of challenges of the denials and number of reversals of initial denials;* * *Section 9. Sections 6115(b)(1)(i), 6122(a) and 6124 of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6115. Loans on, or lending or giving firearms prohibited.* * *(b) Exception.--(1) Subsection (a) shall not apply if any of the following apply:(i) The person who receives the firearm is licensed to carry a firearm under section 6109 (relating to [licenses] license to carry).* * *§ 6122. Proof of license and exception.(a) General rule.--When carrying a firearm concealed on or about one's person or in a vehicle, an individual licensed to carry a firearm shall, upon lawful demand of a law enforcement officer, produce the [license] individual's firearm eligibility license and license to carry for inspection. Failure to produce [such license] the licenses either at the time of arrest or at the preliminary hearing shall create a rebuttable presumption of nonlicensure.* * *§ 6124. Administrative regulations.The commissioner may establish form specifications and regulations, consistent with [section] sections 6109(c) 20260HB2126PN2748 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to [licenses)] license to carry) and 6109.1 (relating to firearm eligibility license), with respect to uniform forms control, including the following:(1) License to carry firearms.(2) Firearm registration.(3) Dealer's license.(4) Application for purchase of a firearm.(5) Record of sale of firearms.(6) Firearm eligibility license.Section 10. Section 6108(a)(7) introductory paragraph of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 6108. Relief.(a) General rule.--Subject to subsection (a.1), the court may grant any protection order or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of abuse of the plaintiff or minor children. The order or agreement may include:* * *(7) Prohibiting the defendant from acquiring or possessing any firearm for the duration of the order, ordering the defendant to temporarily relinquish to the sheriff or the appropriate law enforcement agency any firearms under the defendant's possession or control, and requiring the defendant to relinquish to the sheriff or the appropriate law enforcement agency any firearm license issued under section 6108.3 (relating to relinquishment to third party for safekeeping) or 18 Pa.C.S. § 6106 (relating to firearms not to be carried without a license) or 6109 (relating to [licenses] license to carry) the defendant may possess. The court may also order the defendant to relinquish the defendant's other weapons or ammunition that have been 20260HB2126PN2748 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 used or been threatened to be used in an incident of abuse against the plaintiff or the minor children. A copy of the court's order shall be transmitted to the chief or head of the appropriate law enforcement agency and to the sheriff of the county of which the defendant is a resident. When relinquishment is ordered, the following shall apply:* * *Section 11. Sections 2325(a.1) and 2525(a) of Title 34 are amended to read:§ 2325. Cooperation after lawfully killing big game.* * *(a.1) Exception.--Nothing in this section shall prohibit any person from carrying a loaded handgun in the field provided that person is in compliance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 6109 (relating to [licenses] license to carry).* * *§ 2525. Possession of firearm for protection of self or others.(a) General rule.--It is lawful for a law enforcement officer or any person who possesses a valid license to carry a firearm issued under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6109 (relating to [licenses] license to carry) to be in possession of a loaded or unloaded firearm while engaged in any activity regulated by this title.* * *Section 12. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2126PN2748 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324